ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/ro_RO/hyph_ro_RO.dic
xer1cit
xerci1ta
3xercitar
1xă
1xu
x2v
x1p
x1c
î2n
în1ar
î1na
î3no
în1tă3
în1t
1k
ke2
.ne1ş
.1ţa1
.ţă3ri
.1ţă
.mu3ţ
.ş2
a1niţ
a1iţ
a1eş1
a1uţ
amu3ţ
a1mu
ale2ş
a3leşi.
ale1şi
ara2ţi3a
3acţionat
a2c1ţ
ac1ţi1o
acţi1on
acţio1na
aceş1
a1şo
aş1t
aş2ti.
a1şu
2b1ţ
be1ţ
bu1ţ
n1alţi
nal1ţ
2n1ţ
1ni1ţe
1ni1ţă
ni1u3ţ
1niş
ne1aş
nă1ş
ncep1ţi3e
n1ce
ncep1ţ
n1şt
n1şe
di1aţ
di1oş
3ducaţie.
duca1ţi3e
du1ca
o1ataţ
o1aţ
o1ţi
o1iţ
osta3ţ
o3sta2ţi.
o1riţ
or2ş
oş1t
oş2ti.
oşte1n
oş1te
o1şe
o1şu
3tauraţ
1ti1aţ
1tiţ
ti1u3ţ
tec1ţi3e
te2c1ţ
tă1ş
tu1ţ
tâ3ţ
2ţ.
1ţa
ţa1ru
1ţo
2ţi.
1ţia
ţi1at
ţi1a1z
ţi1ar
1ţin
1ţi1o
1ţit
1ţiţ
1ţii
1ţie
ţi1er
1ţi1u
ţi2ul
1ţis
1ţim
1ţi1l
1ţiri
1ţire.
ţi1re
1ţiş
1ţe
ţe1n
ţe2ni.
1ţă
1ţu
ţu3m
1ţân
i1o2ţ
i1ţâ
iu3ţ
i1riş
i1şo
i1şe
i1şu
e1an1ţe
ea2n1ţ
e1a2c1ţ
e1niţ
4etă1ţii
e1tă
e1iţ
e1u1ş
es3pe2c1ţ
er2şi.
er1ş
e1şi
e3şi1l
e1şe
e1şc
1zaţ
4zaţi1ei
za1ţie
4zac1ţi1o
za2c1ţ
zi1aţ
1zi1ţ
ă1ţâ
ă1iţ
ă1iş
ă1riţ
ă1şo
ăş1tia
ăş1tie
ă1şe
ă1şu
u1ţâ
u1iţ
u1iş
u1riţ
u1riş
urâ3ţ
uca1ţi3e
u1ca
u1şe
uşu1r
uş3c
sa1ş
so3ţi
solu1ţi3e
so1lu
solu1ţ
s1ţ
3senţia2l.
se2n1ţ
sen1ţia
senţi1al
mbunătă3ţi.
mbu1nă
mbună1t
mbună1tă
m1ţ
m3ţi
mi2n3ţ
mi2ţa
1miş
mă1ş
mul3ţ
muş1
l1ţ
li1aţ
li1niş1
1liş
lă1ţ
lu1ţ
2lş
l1şe
l1şu
r1ţ
ri1aţ
ri1aş
ri1eţ
1rişt
1rişc
re1aţi
relaţi4
re1l
2reş.
ră3ţ
r1ş
vi1aţi
vă1ţ
vă3ţi
vu1ţ
gi1aţ
giş1
2geş.
gă3ţ
gu1ş
po2ţ
p1ţ
pi1aţi
3pectaţ
păr3ţ
pă1ş
pu1ţ
1puş
prăş1t
â1niţ
âr3ţ
âş1t
â1şi
â1şu
2c1ţ
ci1aţ
1ciţ
cer3ş
1cuţ
1cul1ţ
c1şo
1chiş
1şa
şa1d
şa1lu
şa1po
ş1n
şo1b
3şor
ş1tit
ş1ti1l
1şia
şi1at
şi1aţ
şi1au
1şin
1şit
1şiţ
3şii
1şie
şi1er
1şiu
1şim
1şi1l
1şir
1şic
1şe.
şe1n
şe1z
şe1u
1şe1l
1şă1
şu1t
1şul
1şu1g
şu1ş
ş1m
ş1l
1şâ
hi3ţ
1fa2c1ţ
fi2n3ţ
fe1ţ
fă1ţ
ji1niţ
în1ş
.ne1ș
.1ța1
.ță3ri
.1ță
.mu3ț
.ș2
a1niț
a1iț
a1eș1
a1uț
amu3ț
ale2ș
a3leși.
ale1și
ara2ți3a
3acționat
a2c1ț
ac1ți1o
acți1on
acțio1na
aceș1
a1șo
aș1t
aș2ti.
a1șu
2b1ț
be1ț
bu1ț
n1alți
nal1ț
2n1ț
1ni1țe
1ni1ță
ni1u3ț
1niș
ne1aș
nă1ș
ncep1ți3e
ncep1ț
n1șt
n1șe
di1aț
di1oș
3ducație.
duca1ți3e
o1ataț
o1aț
o1ți
o1iț
osta3ț
o3sta2ți.
o1riț
or2ș
oș1t
oș2ti.
oște1n
oș1te
o1șe
o1șu
3tauraț
1ti1aț
1tiț
ti1u3ț
tec1ți3e
te2c1ț
tă1ș
tu1ț
tâ3ț
2ț.
1ța
ța1ru
1țo
2ți.
1ția
ți1at
ți1a1z
ți1ar
1țin
1ți1o
1țit
1țiț
1ții
1ție
ți1er
1ți1u
ți2ul
1țis
1țim
1ți1l
1țiri
1țire.
ți1re
1țiș
1țe
țe1n
țe2ni.
1ță
1țu
țu3m
1țân
i1o2ț
i1țâ
iu3ț
i1riș
i1șo
i1șe
i1șu
e1an1țe
ea2n1ț
e1a2c1ț
e1niț
4etă1ții
e1iț
e1u1ș
es3pe2c1ț
er2și.
er1ș
e1și
e3și1l
e1șe
e1șc
1zaț
4zați1ei
za1ție
4zac1ți1o
za2c1ț
zi1aț
1zi1ț
ă1țâ
ă1iț
ă1iș
ă1riț
ă1șo
ăș1tia
ăș1tie
ă1șe
ă1șu
u1țâ
u1iț
u1iș
u1riț
u1riș
urâ3ț
uca1ți3e
u1șe
ușu1r
uș3c
sa1ș
so3ți
solu1ți3e
solu1ț
s1ț
3senția2l.
se2n1ț
sen1ția
senți1al
mbunătă3ți.
m1ț
m3ți
mi2n3ț
mi2ța
1miș
mă1ș
mul3ț
muș1
l1ț
li1aț
li1niș1
1liș
lă1ț
lu1ț
2lș
l1șe
l1șu
r1ț
ri1aț
ri1aș
ri1eț
1rișt
1rișc
re1ați
relați4
2reș.
ră3ț
r1ș
vi1ați
vă1ț
vă3ți
vu1ț
gi1aț
giș1
2geș.
gă3ț
gu1ș
po2ț
p1ț
pi1ați
3pectaț
păr3ț
pă1ș
pu1ț
1puș
prăș1t
â1niț
âr3ț
âș1t
â1și
â1șu
2c1ț
ci1aț
1ciț
cer3ș
1cuț
1cul1ț
c1șo
1chiș
1șa
șa1d
șa1lu
șa1po
ș1n
șo1b
3șor
ș1tit
ș1ti1l
1șia
și1at
și1aț
și1au
1șin
1șit
1șiț
3șii
1șie
și1er
1șiu
1șim
1și1l
1șir
1șic
1șe.
șe1n
șe1z
șe1u
1șe1l
1șă1
șu1t
1șul
1șu1g
șu1ș
ș1m
ș1l
1șâ
hi3ț
1fa2c1ț
fi2n3ț
fe1ț
fă1ț
ji1niț
în1ș
